Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6130
Certificate of authority; issuance.

The director shall issue a certificate of authority to a reorganized stock insurer when the mutual insurer files with the director (1) a certificate stating that all of the conditions set forth in the plan of reorganization have been satisfied so long as the board of directors of the mutual insurer has not abandoned the plan of reorganization pursuant to section 44-6133 and (2) a certificate from the mutual insurer setting forth the vote and certifying that the plan of reorganization was approved by not less than two-thirds of the policyholders voting in person or by proxy on the plan of reorganization. The reorganization shall be effective upon the issuance of a certificate of authority by the director. Upon issuance of the certificate of authority, the insurer's articles of incorporation shall be treated as amended in compliance with section 44-231.

Laws 1997, LB 740, § 9.